Georgia, session 2025_26, HB642.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Dye Free School Meals Act."
SECTION 2.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Scientific research has demonstrated that synthetic food dyes can contribute to
hyperactivity, inattention, restlessness, sleeplessness, irritability, aggression, and other
behavioral challenges in some children. These effects can impact a child's ability to
learn, focus, and participate in educational activities; and
H. B. 642
- 1 -

LC 61 0174
(2) Taxpayer funded meal and snack programs provided to children in public schools
should support, not hinder, a child's cognitive and behavioral development. School meals
and snacks should prioritize nourishment to promote the health and well-being of children
and their abilities to meet educational expectations.
SECTION 3.
Part 3 of Article 16 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to student health, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"20-2-779.5.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'synthetic dye' means:
(1) Blue 1;
(2) Blue 2;
(3) Green 3;
(4) Red 3;
(5) Red 40;
(6) Yellow 5; or
(7) Yellow 6.
(b) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, no public primary or secondary school shall
serve or sell, or allow a third party to serve or sell, any food or beverage that contains
synthetic dye on school grounds during the regular school day or as part of a school
breakfast program.
(c) This Code section shall not be construed so as to prohibit the parent or guardian of a
student at a public primary or secondary school from providing food or beverages that
contain synthetic dye to such parent's or guardian's child or for a school or classroom event.
(d) The Department of Education shall develop a standardized form that public primary
and secondary schools may use to certify that such schools are in compliance with the
provisions of this Code section. The Department of Education shall maintain a list of
H. B. 642
- 2 -

LC 61 0174
schools that have certified compliance with the provisions of this Code section and shall
make such list available on its public website."
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 642
- 3 -